src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3RUONAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** ruonâs:ruonâs, nuurras WG NEP,  blank for the rest 
+N: X_RUONAS ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH%>ij Rhash ; 
 
+N+Sg+Nom: CPXsuff ;             ! ruo'Nâsâm, nuurrâsâm nuRâsâm 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân nuRâsân 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân 
+N+Sg+Ill:^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist CPXsuff ;    ! ruo'Nâsistân nuRâsistân 
+N+Sg+Com:^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! ruonâsijnân nuRâsijnân 
+N+Ess:^WG^RLEN%>in CPXsuff ;    ! ruo'nâsnân nurâsnân 
 
+N+Pl+Gen:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ; ! pihtâsijdân guin 
 
+N:^WG^RLEN%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^RLEN 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^RLEN 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 
 
LEXICON X_RUONAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** WG NEP,  blank for the rest 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN K ;  ! mielgâs, nuurâs 
+Sg+Gen:^RLEN K ;     ! mielgâs ! This is the stem 
+Sg+Acc:^RLEN K ;     ! mielgâs 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân K ;  ! mielgâsân 
+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist K ; ! mielgâsist 
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin K ; ! mielgâsáin 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;    ! pihtâsttáá 
+Ess:^WG%>in K ;      ! pivtâsin 
+Par:^WG%>id K ;      ! pivtâsid 
:^CSH  X_eh_PL ;      ! mielgâseh 
 
 
 
LEXICON 3VUONJAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  kierâš, stem: kierrâ, px kierâččâm 
+N+Sg+Nom:š^WG K ;         ! vuonjâš 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:š^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:š^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čij Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:š K ;                      ! vuonnjâš 
+N+Sg+Acc:š K ;                      ! vuonnjâš 
+N+Sg+Ill:čč^CSH%>ân K ;             ! vuonjâččân 
+N+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:č^CSH%>ân K ;     ! vuonjâčân 
+N+Sg+Loc:čč^CSH%>ist K ;            ! vuonjâččist 
+N+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:č^CSH%>ist K ;    ! vuonjâčist 
+N+Sg+Com:čč^CSH%>áin K ;            ! vuonjâččáin 
+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:č^CSH%>áin K ;    ! vuonjâčáin 
+N+Sg+Abe:%>šttáá K ;                ! vuonnjâšttáá 
+N+Ess:čč^CSH%>in K ;                ! vuonjâččin 
+N+Par:čč^CSH%>id K ;                ! vuonjâččid 
+N+Pl+Nom:čč^CSH%>eh K ;             ! vuonjâččeh 
+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čeh K ;     ! vuonjâčeh 
+N+Pl+Gen:čč^CSH%>ij K ;             ! vuonjâččij 
+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čij K ;     ! vuonjâčij 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH%>ččijd K ;            ! vuonjâččijd 
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čijd K ;    ! vuonjâčijd 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH%>ččáid K ;            ! vuonjâččáid 
+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čáid K ;    ! vuonjâčáid 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH%>ččijn K ;            ! vuonjâččijn 
+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čijn K ;    ! vuonjâčijn 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH%>ččij GUIN ;          ! vuonjâččijguin 
+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čij GUIN ;  ! vuonjâčijguin 
+N+Pl+Abe:^CSH%>ččijttáá K ;         ! vuonjâččijttáá 
+N+Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:^CSH%>čijttáá K ; ! vuonjâčijttáá 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:čč^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruo'Nâsâm, nuurrâsâm nuRâsâm 
+N+Sg+Gen:čč^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân nuRâsân 
+N+Sg+Acc:čč^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân 
+N+Sg+Ill:čč^CSH CPXsuff ;         ! ruonâsân 
+N+Sg+Loc:čč^CSH%>ist CPXsuff ;    ! ruo'Nâsistân nuRâsistân 
+N+Sg+Com:čč^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! ruonâsijnân nuRâsijnân 
+N+Ess:čč^RLEN%>in CPXsuff ;       ! ruo'nâsnân nurâsnân 
 
+N+Pl+Gen:č^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;   ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijdân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! pihtâsijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ; ! pihtâsijdân guin 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:ččá^CSH 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:ččá^CSH 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 

 
LEXICON 3CEVE !!≈ * **@CODE@** only for this lemma. It could go to 3LYEME but needs modifications of rules to get iä:e and -tt-, and the worst part is v:vv 
+N+Sg+Nom:eve K ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:eve Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:iäppát Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:iäppát K ; 
+N+Sg+Acc:iäppát K ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:iäpáttân K ; 
+N+Sg+Loc:iäpáttist K ; 
+N+Sg+Com:iäpáttáin K ; 
+N+Sg+Abe:iäppáttáá K ; 
+N+Ess:iäpáttin K ;   
+N+Ess:evveen                    K ; 
+N+Par:iäpáttid            K ; 
+N+Par:evveed                    K ; 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:iäpátt CPXsuff ;    ! čiäpáttâm, čiäpáttân 
+N+Sg+Gen:iäpátt CPXsuff ;    ! čiäpáttân 
+N+Sg+Acc:iäpátt CPXsuff ;    ! čiäpáttân 
+N+Sg+Ill:iäpáts CPXsuff ;    ! čiäppátsân 
+N+Sg+Loc:iäpáttist CPXsuff ; ! čiäpáttistân 
+N+Sg+Com:iäpáttijn CPXsuff ; ! čiäpáttijnân 
+N+Ess:iäppátn CPXsuff ;      ! čiäppátnân 
 
+N+Pl+Gen:iäpáttijd CPXsuff ;    ! čiäpáttijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:iäpáttijd CPXsuff ;    ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:iäpáttijd CPXsuff ;    ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:iäpáttijn CPXsuff ;    ! čiäpáttijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:iäpáttijd CPXsuffCOM ; ! čiäpáttijdânguin 
 
+N:iäpátt  X_eh_PL ; 

+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:iäpáttá 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:iäpáttá 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 
 
 
LEXICON 3LYEME !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem: luámmá^SVn^ÁE 
+N+Sg+Nom:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SVSH K ;           ! lyeme savo 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SVSH%>  Rhash ; ! lyemelitte 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH^SVSH%>ij  Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:K ;                   ! luámmán savvoon 
+N+Sg+Acc:K ;                   ! luámmán 
+N+Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân K ;     ! luáṃánân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist K ;    ! luáṃánist 
+N+Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>áin K ;    ! luáṃánáin 
+N+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;            ! luámmánttáá 
+N+Ess:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>n K ; ! lyemeen 
+N+Ess:^CSH%>in K ;             ! lyeme 
+N+Par:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>d K ; ! lyemeed 
+N+Par:^CSH%>id K ;             ! lyeme 
+N:^CSH^SVSH  X_eh_PL ; 
+N:^FCD^WG^SVSH%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^CSH^SVSH 3EEMEED_SG_DIM ; !
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^CSH^SVSH 3EEMEED_PL_DIM ; !
 
 
 
 
 
LEXICON 3HUKSIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA + Abe blank, SLEN for the rest 
3HUKSIM_SG ; 
3HUKSIM_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 3HUKSIM_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA + Abe blank, SLEN for the rest 
+N+Sg+Nom: K ;                 ! huksim 
+N+Sg+Gen: K ;                 ! huksim   
+N+Sg+Acc: K ;                 ! huksim 
+N+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>ân K ;        ! huksiimân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>ist K ;       ! huksiimist 
+N+Sg+Com:^SLEN%>áin K ;       ! huksiimáin 
+N+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;           ! huksimttáá 
+N+Ess:^SLEN%>in K ;           ! huksiimin    
+N+Par:^SLEN%>id K ;           ! huksiimid    
+N+Sg+Nom: CPXsuff ;           ! huksiimâm 
+N+Sg+Gen: CPXsuff ;           ! huksiimân 
+N+Sg+Acc: CPXsuff ;           ! huksiimân 
+N+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>s CPXsuff ;   ! huksimsân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>ist CPXsuff ; ! huksiimistân 
+N+Sg+Com:^SLEN%>ijn CPXsuff ; ! huksiimijnân 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;           ! huksimnân 
 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
 
LEXICON 3HUKSIM_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** plurals for 3HUKSIM 
+N:^SLEN X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Err/Orth: X_eh_PL ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^SLEN%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! huksiimijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^SLEN%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! huksiimijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^SLEN%>ijd CPXsuff ;    ! huksiimijdân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^SLEN%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! huksiimijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:^SLEN%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ; ! huksiimijdânguin 
 
