src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
vuodâčeve+Sem/Dummytag:vuodâ#č 3CEVE "" ;
normim+Sem/Act:normi^SVm 3HUKSIM "standardisointi" ;
kolmâstielâs+Sem/Dummytag:kolmâ#stiellâs 3RUONAS "" ;
čuámáttâsnuurâs+Sem/Dummytag:čuámáttâs#nuurrâs 3RUONAS "" ;
puttâlčeve+Sem/Dummytag:puttâl#č 3CEVE "pullonkaula" ;
kuáhtučeve+Sem/Body:kuáhtu#č 3CEVE "kohdunkaula" ;
čáálus+Sem/Dummytag:čáállus 3RUONAS "kirjelmä" ;
tutkâmvuávám+Sem/Dummytag:tutkâm#vuává^SVm 3HUKSIM "tutkimussuunnitelma" ;
ruossâlistum+Sem/Dummytag:ruossâlistu^SVm 3HUKSIM "risteymä" ;
merkkum+Sem/Act:merkku^SVm 3HUKSIM "merkintä" ;
ovdâmerkkim+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâ#merkki^SVm 3HUKSIM "etumerkintä" ;
huáppuvaljiimeh+Sem/Act:huáppu#valji^SVm 3HUKSIM_PL "pikavalinta" ;
niärvárađeruvvim+Sem/Act:niärvárađe#ruvvi^SVm 3HUKSIM "hermoratahieronta" ;
tormehiäŋgám+Sem/Act:torme#hiäŋgá^SVm 3HUKSIM "turmariipunta" ;
vyeijimstielâs+Sem/Dummytag:vyeijim#stiellâs 3RUONAS "ajokaista" ;
piikkisiemâ+Sem/Dummytag:piikki#siemmân 3LYEME "kalliosirkunjyvä" ;
syejistielâs+Sem/Dummytag:syeji#stiellâs 3RUONAS "suojavyöhyke" ;
riddostielâs+Sem/Dummytag:riddo#stiellâs 3RUONAS "rantavyöhyke" ;
ATK-kiäjus+Sem/Dummytag:ATK-kiäčč4us 3RUONAS "pääte" ;
ruotâsmumriesâ+Sem/Dummytag:ruotâsmum#riessâm 3LYEME "juurtumahapsi" ;
breikkitánssám+Sem/Dummytag:breikki#tánssá^SVm 3HUKSIM "breikkaus" ;
pyereestpiergim+Sem/Dummytag:pyereest#piergi^SVm 3HUKSIM "ekonominen hyvinvointi" ;
sieptâs+Sem/Dummytag:sieptâs 3RUONAS "houkutussyötti" ;
čááitustivrim+Sem/Dummytag:čááitu#stivri^SVm 3HUKSIM "näytönohjain" ;
koskâtienâs+Sem/Dummytag:koskâ#tiennâs 3RUONAS "keskitulo" ;
toppum+Sem/Dummytag:toppu^SVm 3HUKSIM "tukos" ;
piäjus+Sem/Dummytag:piäi4jus 3RUONAS "rahapanos" ;
simultaantulkkum+Sem/Dummytag:simultaan#tulkku^SVm 3HUKSIM "simultaanitulkkaus" ;
velgisaneerim+Sem/Dummytag:velgi#saneeri^SVm 3HUKSIM "velkasaneeraus" ;
kuvvim+Sem/Dummytag:kuvvi^SVm 3HUKSIM "kuvaus" ;
olesčurgim+Sem/Dummytag:oles#čurgi^SVm 3HUKSIM "suursiivous" ;
kaavam+Sem/Dummytag:kaava^SVm 3HUKSIM "kaavoitus" ;
parâhammim+Sem/Dummytag:parâ#hammi^SVm 3HUKSIM "parinmuodostus" ;
viärutollim+Sem/Dummytag:viäru#tolli^SVm 3HUKSIM "veronpidätys" ;
viljâtievâš+Sem/Dummytag:viljâ#tievvâ 3VUONJAS "veljekset" ;
čalmeraamâs+Sem/Dummytag:čalme#raammâs 3RUONAS "silmäripset" ;
viällám+Sem/Dummytag:viällá^SVm 3HUKSIM "makuu" ;
saarâs+Sem/Dummytag:saarrâs 3RUONAS "rönsy" ;
riesâ+Sem/Dummytag:riessâm 3LYEME ;
siämu+Sem/Dummytag:siämmun 3LYEME ;
spiđgám+Sem/Dummytag:spiđgá^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
paddim+Sem/Dummytag:paddi^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
piergim+Sem/Dummytag:piergi^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
kovjim+Sem/Dummytag:kovji^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
áimukuškim+Sem/Dummytag:áimu#kuški^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
sisâsuoppim+Sem/Dummytag:sisâ#suoppi^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
tussim+Sem/Dummytag:tussi^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
heevim+Sem/Dummytag:heevi^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
tulkkum+Sem/Dummytag:tulkku^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
tiettum+Sem/Dummytag:tiettu^SVm 3HUKSIM ;
kierâš+Sem/Dummytag:kierrâ 3VUONJAS ;
jaamâs+Sem/Dummytag:jaammâs 3RUONAS ;
roomâs+Sem/Dummytag:roommâs 3RUONAS ;
spoonâs+Sem/Dummytag:spoonnâs 3RUONAS ;
njuosâs+Sem/Dummytag:njuossâs 3RUONAS ;
laađâs+Sem/Dummytag:laađđâs 3RUONAS ;
juoŋâs+Sem/Dummytag:juoŋŋâs 3RUONAS ; ! juoŋâs, juoŋŋâs, juo'ŋâseh
kuálus+Sem/Dummytag:kuállus 3RUONAS ;
liäđus+Sem/Dummytag:liäđđus 3RUONAS ;
vuášus+Sem/Dummytag:vuáššus 3RUONAS ;
árvu-uásus+Sem/Dummytag:árvu-#uássus 3RUONAS ;
herskusmiäruh+Sem/Plant-fungus:hersku#smiärruh 3RUONAS "" ;
jotkâškovlim+Sem/Edu:jotkâ#škovli^SVm 3HUKSIM ; ! tags_via_apertium
juávus+Sem/Org:juáhus 3RUONAS ; ! D X V	! tags_via_apertium
kubdânjunvuonjâš+Sem/Ani-bird:kubdânjun#vuonnjâ 3VUONJAS "lapasorsa" ;
kuolbâsildesmiäruh+Sem/Plant-fungus:kuolbâsilde#smiärruh 3RUONAS "kangassillihapero" ;
lyeme+Sem/Plant:luámmá^SVn^ÁE 3LYEME ; 	!YAML ¢luámánáin, luámánist, luámánân, luámmán lyemeen tags_via_apertium
muáskáš+Sem/Plant:muáská 3VUONJAS ; ! D XY V	!¢muáskáččáin, muáskáččist, muáskáččân, muáskáš tags_via_apertium
penuvkuálus+Sem/Ani_Group:penuv#kuállus 3RUONAS "koiravaljakko" ;  ! tags_via_apertium
ruostâvuonjâš+Sem/Ani-bird:ruostâ#vuonnjâ 3VUONJAS "ruostesorsa" ;
ruánáásildesmiäruh+Sem/Plant-fungus:ruánáásilde#smiärruh 3RUONAS "vihersillihapero" ;
ränisvuonjâš+Sem/Ani-bird:ränis#vuonnjâ 3VUONJAS "harmaasorsa" ;
savo+Sem/Plc:savvoon 3LYEME ; 	!¢savonáin, savonist, savonân, savvoon tags_via_apertium
siemâ+Sem/Plantpart:siemmân 3LYEME ; 	!¢siemânáin, siemânist, siemânân, siemmân tags_via_apertium
suávirotosmiäruh+Sem/Plant-fungus:suáviroto#smiärruh 3RUONAS "koivunlehtohapero" ;
tuvvásmiäruh+Sem/Plant-fungus:tuvvá#smiärruh 3RUONAS "kyyhkyhapero" ;
veškivuonjâš+Sem/Ani-bird:veški#vuonnjâ 3VUONJAS "kuparisorsa" ;
vuonjâš+Sem/Ani-bird:vuonnjâ 3VUONJAS "jouhisorsa" ;	! YAML  tags_via_apertium
vuorâš+Sem/Ani-bird:vuorrâ 3VUONJAS ;
vyene+Sem/Hum:vuánná^SVm^ÁE 3LYEME ; !D X V	!OBS vyeneen, like lyemeen?  tags_via_apertium
čeve+Sem/Body:č 3CEVE ; ! čiäppát	!¢čiäpáttáin, čiäpáttist, čiäpáttân, čiäppát !YAML tags_via_apertium
šiljonjuolâs+Sem/Plant:šiljo#njuollâs 3RUONAS "pihatatar" ;
